District of Columbia statutes.
38-1902

Installment payments to certain teachers.

On and after July 1, 1943, the Board of Education is authorized to designate the months in which the 10 salary payments shall be made to teachers assigned to instruction in elementary science and school gardening, and in health, physical education, and playground activities.

History

July 1, 1943, 57 Stat. 322, ch. 184, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1003.
1973 Ed., § 31-609a.